src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjectives
ерусалимса+A:ерусалимса A_ ;
абонементнӧй+A:абонементнӧй A_F1_oj ;
аборигеннӧй+A:аборигеннӧй A_F1_oj ;
абрикосовӧй+A:абрикосовӧй A_F1_oj ;
абсурднӧй+A:абсурднӧй A_F1_oj ;
авансовӧй+A:авансовӧй A_F1_oj ;
аварийно-спасательнӧй+A:аварийно-спасательнӧй A_F1_oj ;
авиамодельнӧй+A:авиамодельнӧй A_F1_oj ;
авиационно-инженернӧй+A:авиационно-инженернӧй A_F1_oj ;
автобронетанковӧй+A:автобронетанковӧй A_F1_oj ;
автодорожнӧй+A:автодорожнӧй A_F1_oj ;
автомашиннӧй+A:автомашиннӧй A_F1_oj ;
автопередвижнӧй+A:автопередвижнӧй A_F1_oj ;
автостопнӧй+A:автостопнӧй A_F1_oj ;
автоэкспертнӧй+A:автоэкспертнӧй A_F1_oj ;
ананьинскӧй+A:ананьинскӧй A_F1_skoj ;
англо-русско+A:англо-русско A_F1 ;
англо-франко+A:англо-франко A_F1 ;
асламовӧй+A:асламовӧй A_ ;
асыввывса+A:асыввывса A_sa ;
асывса+A:асывса A_sa ;
асывья+A:асывья A_ja ;
ашынся+A:ашынся A_sja ;
баксанскӧй+A:баксанскӧй A_F1_skoj ;
басманнӧй+A:басманнӧй A_F1_oj ;
бельчочком+A:бельчочком A_ ;
берся+A:берся A_sja ;
бисертскӧй+A:бисертскӧй A_F1_skoj ;
бледнӧйкодь+A:бледнӧйкодь A_9 ;
бӧбкодь+A:бӧбкодь A_9 ;
богат+A:мед«богат A_IS_SUPERL ;
бӧртіся+A:бӧртіся A_sja ;
бӧрья+A:мед«бӧрья A_IS_SUPERL "CHECKME";
брыжья+A:брыжья A_ja ;
будзгыля+A:будзгыля A_ja ;
быгӧсь+A:быгӧсь A_osj ;
быгрӧтчан+A:быгрӧтчан A_ ;
быдкадся+A:быдкадся A_sja ;
быдлуння+A:быдлуння A_ja ;
быкыша+A:быкыша A_a ;
бытшӧм+A:мед«бытшӧм A_IS_SUPERL ;
важгодся+A:важгодся A_sja ;
важӧв+A:важӧв A_9 ;
вазыркья+A:вазыркья A_ja ;
ванвиздинскӧй+A:ванвиздинскӧй A_F1_skoj ;
варовӧй+A:варовӧй A_ ;
вашко-мезено+A:вашко-мезено A_F1 ;
вежвевья+A:вежвевья A_ja ;
вилегодскӧй+A:вилегодскӧй A_F1_skoj ;
вились-виль+A:вились-виль A_ ;
вильгодся+A:вильгодся A_sja ;
винерик+A:винерик A_9 ;
витвӧрта+A:витвӧрта A_a ;
войнабӧрся+A:войнабӧрся A_sja ;
войнаодзся+A:войнаодзся A_sja ;
вӧркылӧтан+A:вӧркылӧтан A_ ;
вӧрья+A:вӧрья A_ja ;
восемьдесятгодся+A:восемьдесятгодся A_sja ;
всезырянскӧй+A:всезырянскӧй A_F1_skoj ;
вына+A:мед«вына A_IS_SUPERL ;
гажӧтчан+A:мед«гажӧтчан A_IS_SUPERL ;
гажтӧм+A:мед«гажтӧм A_IS_SUPERL ;
гажтӧмӧв+A:гажтӧмӧв A_9 ;
гезъя+A:гезъя A_ja ;
геркулесӧвӧй+A:геркулесӧвӧй A_F1_oj ;
гӧрдзвездаа+A:гӧрдзвездаа A_a ;
гӧрдкодь+A:гӧрдкодь A_9 ;
грачёвскӧй+A:грачёвскӧй A_F1_skoj ;
гудырӧв+A:гудырӧв A_9 ;
гырисся-гырись+A:гырисся-гырись A_ ;
гырись+A:мед«гырись A_IS_SUPERL ;
Дальне-Восточнӧй+A:Дальне-Восточнӧй A_F1_oj ;
даскватьгодся+A:даскватьгодся A_sja ;
дженытик+A:дженытик A_9 ;
джуджыт+A:мед«джуджыт A_IS_SUPERL ;
дзескытӧв+A:дзескытӧв A_9 ;
дзор+A:дзор A_ ;
дзугья+A:дзугья A_ja ;
дивуйтана+A:мед«дивуйтана A_IS_SUPERL ;
дивуйтана+A:мед«дивуйтана A_IS_SUPERL ;
дойӧсь+A:дойӧсь A_osj ;
долонскӧй+A:долонскӧй A_F1_skoj ;
донаӧв+A:донаӧв A_9 ;
дузгыра+A:дузгыра A_a ;
дукакодь+A:дукакодь A_9 ;
ентӧдтӧм+A:ен#тӧд»тӧм A_tom ;
жагӧв+A:жагӧв A_9 ;
ждановскӧй+A:ждановскӧй A_F1_skoj ;
жолвакӧсь+A:жолвакӧсь A_osj ;
жоруч+A:жоруч A_ ;
зинзӧвӧй+A:зинзӧвӧй A_F1_oj ;
зӧрья+A:зӧрья A_ja ;
зубыт+A:мед«зубыт A_IS_SUPERL ;
зубытӧв+A:зубытӧв A_9 ;
зынӧсь+A:зынӧсь A_osj ;
зэркытӧв+A:зэркытӧв A_9 ;
иерусалимскӧй+A:иерусалимскӧй A_F1_skoj ;
иньвадорся+A:иньвадорся A_sja ;
йикиа+A:йикиа A_ ;
йӧрувтся+A:йӧрувтся A_sja ;
йылыша+A:йылыша A_a ;
йыӧсь+A:йыӧсь A_osj ;
казанлыкскӧй+A:казанлыкскӧй A_F1_skoj ;
Камо-Вычегодско+A:Камо-Вычегодско A_F1 ;
Камско-Вычегодско+A:Камско-Вычегодско A_F1 ;
кватьдасгодся+A:кватьдасгодся A_sja ;
квашнинскӧй+A:квашнинскӧй A_F1_skoj ;
кельыт-лӧз+A:кельыт-лӧз A_ ;
керья+A:керья A_ja ;
кӧдзытӧв+A:кӧдзытӧв A_9 ;
кӧинъя+A:кӧинъя A_ja ;
кокнит+A:мед«кокнит A_IS_SUPERL ;
кокнитӧв+A:кокнитӧв A_9 ;
колана+A:мед«колана A_IS_SUPERL ;
кольтьвеж+A:кольтьвеж A_ ;
Коми-Пермяцкӧй+A:Коми-Пермяцкӧй A_F1_skoj ;
конечтӧм+A:конечтӧм A_tom ;
косвиа+A:косвиа A_a ;
крут+A:мед«крут A_IS_SUPERL ;
крыловскӧй+A:крыловскӧй A_F1_skoj ;
кузькиа+A:кузькиа A_a ;
кузькодь+A:кузькодь A_9 ;
кузьпурта+A:кузьпурта A_a ;
куимвося+A:куимвося A_sja ;
куимкока+A:куимкока A_a ;
куйлыса+A:куйлыса A_a ;
кусыня+A:кусыня A_ja ;
кыз+A:мед«кыз A_IS_SUPERL ;
кыкгӧтыра+A:кыкгӧтыра A_a ;
кыкдасгодся+A:кыкдасгодся A_sja ;
кыкпӧлӧс+A:кыкпӧлӧс A_ ;
кылтовса+A:кылтовса A_sa ;
лажмытик+A:лажмытик A_9 ;
ленскӧй+A:ленскӧй A_F1_skoj ;
лёштыра+A:лёштыра A_a ;
лиственичнӧй+A:лиственичнӧй A_F1_oj ;
лӧгвевья+A:лӧгвевья A_ja ;
лунланься+A:лунланься A_sja ;
лунъя+A:лунъя A_ja ;
льӧрӧма+A:льӧрӧма A_a ;
люштыр+A:люштыр A_ ;
лякӧсь+A:лякӧсь A_osj ;
ляльскӧй+A:ляльскӧй A_F1_skoj ;
мазутӧсь+A:мазутӧсь A_osj ;
маслоӧсь+A:маслоӧсь A_osj ;
меддивуйтан+A:меддивуйтан A_9 ;
медматісь+A:медматісь A_9 ;
медсӧстӧм+A:медсӧстӧм A_9 ;
мекканскӧй+A:мекканскӧй A_F1_skoj ;
моросвывса+A:моросвывса A_sa ;
мувывся+A:мувывся A_sja ;
муксим+A:муксим A_ ;
мурӧма+A:мурӧма A_a ;
муувтса+A:муувтса A_sa ;
мылдінскӧй+A:мылдінскӧй A_F1_skoj ;
напарья+A:напарья A_ja ;
небытшӧм+A:небытшӧм A_ ;
невесёв+A:невесёв A_9 ;
некокнит+A:некокнит A_ ;
некрепыт+A:некрепыт A_a ;
нёльпӧвса+A:нёльпӧвса A_a ;
неполiсь+A:неполiсь A_ ;
непырся+A:непырся A_sja ;
нерытик+A:нерытик A_9 ;
нетӧдса+A:нетӧдса A_a ;
нёштӧм+A:нёштӧм A_tom ;
Ново-Садӧвӧй+A:Ново-Садӧвӧй A_F1_oj ;
новокраматорскӧй+A:новокраматорскӧй A_F1_skoj ;
нопья+A:нопья A_ja ;
нылковӧй+A:нылковӧй A_ ;
нязьмӧса+A:нязьмӧса A_a ;
одзза+A:мед«одзза A_IS_SUPERL ;
одззася+A:одззася A_sja ;
одзись+A:мед«одзись A_IS_SUPERL ;
ойвывса+A:ойвывса A_sa ;
ӧнняся+A:ӧнняся A_sja ;
опастӧм+A:опастӧм A_tom ;
орехово-зуевскӧй+A:орехово-зуевскӧй A_F1_skoj ;
ӧтайпӧла+A:ӧтайпӧла A_a ;
ӧтгӧгрӧса+A:ӧтгӧгрӧса A_a ;
ӧтзына+A:ӧтзына A_a ;
ӧтіквирся+A:ӧтіквирся A_sja ;
ӧтілунся+A:ӧтілунся A_sja ;
ӧткепися+A:ӧткепися A_ja ;
ӧткиа+A:ӧткиа A_a ;
ӧтпроймиа+A:ӧтпроймиа A_a ;
ӧтсьӧкыт+A:ӧтсьӧкыт A_ ;
ӧтыжда+A:ӧтыжда A_a ;
панытса+A:панытса A_sa ;
пасьталӧмовӧй+A:пасьталӧмовӧй A_ ;
пепинӧвӧй+A:пепинӧвӧй A_F1_oj ;
пермско-угро+A:пермско-угро A_F1 ;
пермяковскӧй+A:пермяковскӧй A_F1_skoj ;
Печоро-Вычегодско+A:Печоро-Вычегодско A_F1 ;
Пинего-Мезенско+A:Пинего-Мезенско A_F1 ;
пласъя+A:пласъя A_ja ;
пӧрись+A:мед«пӧрись A_IS_SUPERL ;
пӧрись+A:пӧрись A_ ;
пӧрисьӧв+A:пӧрисьӧв A_9 ;
пӧртъя+A:пӧртъя A_ja ;
поснит+A:мед«поснит A_IS_SUPERL ;
праиндийскӧй+A:праиндийскӧй A_F1_skoj ;
пряттьӧсь+A:пряттьӧсь A_osj ;
пустопорожньӧй+A:пустопорожньӧй A_F1_oj ;
пым+A:пым A_ ;
пыркежся+A:пыркежся A_sja ;
Риго-Елгавскӧй+A:Риго-Елгавскӧй A_F1_skoj ;
русско-коми+A:русско-коми A_F1 ;
руш+A:руш A_ ;
рытвывса+A:рытвывса A_sa ;
сапйӧсь+A:сапйӧсь A_osj ;
саракамышскӧй+A:саракамышскӧй A_F1_skoj ;
свӧнъя+A:свӧнъя A_ja ;
Северо-Восточнӧй+A:Северо-Восточнӧй A_F1_oj ;
серӧмсора+A:серӧмсора A_a ;
сина+A:сина A_ ;
скатертнӧй+A:скатертнӧй A_F1_oj ;
сӧнӧсь+A:сӧнӧсь A_osj ;
споринатӧм+A:споринатӧм A_tom ;
Средне-Амурскӧй+A:Средне-Амурскӧй A_F1_skoj ;
стогодся+A:стогодся A_sja ;
сьӧдвевья+A:сьӧдвевья A_ja ;
сьӧкыт+A:мед«сьӧкыт A_IS_SUPERL ;
сэтӧрсина+A:сэтӧрсина A_a ;
тагья+A:тагья A_ja ;
Тимано-Пай+A:Тимано-Пай A_F1 ;
том+A:мед«том A_IS_SUPERL ;
томкадся+A:томкадся A_sja ;
томӧв+A:томӧв A_9 ;
трактовскӧй+A:трактовскӧй A_F1_skoj ;
трехозернӧй+A:трехозернӧй A_F1_oj ;
Троице-Сергиев+A:Троице-Сергиев A_F1 ;
Троице-Стефано+A:Троице-Стефано A_F1 ;
тшаковӧй+A:тшаковӧй A_ ;
тшӧтшья+A:тшӧтшья A_ja ;
тыдалан+A:мед«тыдалан A_IS_SUPERL ;
увса+A:увса A_sa ;
удерлуння+A:удерлуння A_ja ;
ульлунӧсь+A:ульлунӧсь A_osj ;
умӧль+A:мед«умӧль A_IS_SUPERL ;
унагодся+A:унагодся A_sja ;
унарӧма+A:унарӧма A_a ;
Усть-Сысольско+A:Усть-Сысольско A_F1 ;
учитик+A:учитик A_9 ;
учӧт+A:мед«учӧт A_IS_SUPERL ;
хаблонскӧй+A:хаблонскӧй A_F1_skoj ;
центрально-чернозёмнӧй+A:центрально-чернозёмнӧй A_F1_oj ;
чельчакӧсь+A:чельчакӧсь A_osj ;
чӧскыт+A:мед«чӧскыт A_IS_SUPERL ;
шаття-баддя+A:шаття-баддя A_ja ;
Шежамско-Бутканскӧй+A:Шежамско-Бутканскӧй A_F1_skoj ;
шепья+A:шепья A_ja ;
школагоддэзся+A:школагоддэзся A_sja ;
шогӧтӧсь+A:шогӧтӧсь A_osj ;
шонытсьӧлӧма+A:шонытсьӧлӧма A_a ;
шудӧсь+A:шудӧсь A_osj ;
шупыт+A:мед«шупыт A_IS_SUPERL ;
шурӧсь+A:шурӧсь A_osj ;
ыбовӧй+A:ыбовӧй A_ ;
ыджытӧв+A:ыджытӧв A_9 ;
ыджытувса+A:ыджытувса A_sa ;
ылӧстӧм+A:ылӧстӧм A_tom ;
Юго-Западнӧй+A:Юго-Западнӧй A_F1_oj ;
югыт+A:мед«ъюгыт A_IS_SUPERL ;
юрвывса+A:юрвывса A_sa ;
